SpellChecking/Dictionaries/latin uyghur.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3885 Y 1
SFX 3885 q ldurush q
SFX 2129 Y 1
SFX 2129 d ghandek d
SFX 2560 Y 1
SFX 2560 r in r
SFX 4142 Y 1
SFX 4142 s in s
SFX 776 Y 1
SFX 776 u ekla u
SFX 3343 Y 1
SFX 3343 t in t
SFX 2942 Y 1
SFX 2942 a dinmu a
SFX 3479 Y 1
SFX 3479 q le q
SFX 2111 Y 1
SFX 2111 r le r
SFX 1909 Y 1
SFX 1909 a inggha a
SFX 2039 Y 1
SFX 2039 s le s
SFX 3478 Y 1
SFX 3478 t le t
SFX 3182 Y 1
SFX 3182 o ilish o
SFX 249 Y 1
SFX 249 a ighili a
SFX 2914 Y 1
SFX 2914 a ikilermu a
SFX 2171 Y 1
SFX 2171 m ngizghu m
SFX 4921 Y 1
SFX 4921 d ghinigha d
SFX 2275 Y 1
SFX 2275 a ken a
SFX 3449 Y 1
SFX 3449 r ndrlmek r
SFX 1712 Y 1
SFX 1712 z le z
SFX 2580 Y 1
SFX 2580 s ghandek s
SFX 1338 Y 1
SFX 1338 t ghandek t
SFX 2194 Y 1
SFX 2194 d ken d
SFX 3054 Y 1
SFX 3054 l inggha l
SFX 1637 Y 1
SFX 1637 i chanliqini i
SFX 4502 Y 1
SFX 4502 i rsimu i
SFX 1510 Y 1
SFX 1510 d rni d
SFX 3217 Y 1
SFX 3217 t dinmu t
SFX 3610 Y 1
SFX 3610 i rgenlikini i
SFX 3299 Y 1
SFX 3299 l miliq l
SFX 2461 Y 1
SFX 2461 a ighanla a
SFX 808 Y 1
SFX 808 a idila a
SFX 4403 Y 1
SFX 4403 s ghinigha s
SFX 1667 Y 1
SFX 1667 q ken q
SFX 2896 Y 1
SFX 2896 s ken s
SFX 3900 Y 1
SFX 3900 t ken t
SFX 4158 Y 1
SFX 4158 l idila l
SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 t rni t
SFX 1978 Y 1
SFX 1978 z ken z
SFX 4743 Y 1
SFX 4743 a ro a
SFX 3607 Y 1
SFX 3607 d rish d
SFX 487 Y 1
SFX 487 p wridu p
SFX 4263 Y 1
SFX 4263 q nishidin q
SFX 3606 Y 1
SFX 3606 d ro d
SFX 2157 Y 1
SFX 2157 r sida r
SFX 4715 Y 1
SFX 4715 i uqlirini i
SFX 3579 Y 1
SFX 3579 i urushtek i
SFX 1077 Y 1
SFX 1077 e hte e
SFX 583 Y 1
SFX 583 a hini a
SFX 845 Y 1
SFX 845 a imizni a
SFX 263 Y 1
SFX 263 i uridu i
SFX 2145 Y 1
SFX 2145 i ye i
SFX 159 Y 1
SFX 159 i chanliq i
SFX 2009 Y 1
SFX 2009 r zdin r
SFX 192 Y 1
SFX 192 k ye k
SFX 385 Y 1
SFX 385 e hini e
SFX 1374 Y 1
SFX 1374 l ye l
SFX 4050 Y 1
SFX 4050 m nghuchi m
SFX 1242 Y 1
SFX 1242 m ye m
SFX 238 Y 1
SFX 238 n ye n
SFX 1478 Y 1
SFX 1478 i hini i
SFX 3388 Y 1
SFX 3388 r ye r
SFX 2655 Y 1
SFX 2655 l imizni l
SFX 2722 Y 1
SFX 2722 r nghuchi r
SFX 3229 Y 1
SFX 3229 s ye s
SFX 4885 Y 1
SFX 4885 n imizni n
SFX 820 Y 1
SFX 820 t ye t
SFX 4148 Y 1
SFX 4148 o imizni o
SFX 3730 Y 1
SFX 3730 e htur e
SFX 3438 Y 1
SFX 3438 m nmay m
SFX 3950 Y 1
SFX 3950 i enni i
SFX 2511 Y 1
SFX 2511 r nmay r
SFX 3949 Y 1
SFX 3949 m enni m
SFX 2190 Y 1
SFX 2190 k lay k
SFX 2783 Y 1
SFX 2783 n enni n
SFX 680 Y 1
SFX 680 a ighuche a
SFX 3161 Y 1
SFX 3161 q lay q
SFX 3543 Y 1
SFX 3543 u enni u
SFX 3169 Y 1
SFX 3169 q kim q
SFX 4741 Y 1
SFX 4741 d rung d
SFX 3278 Y 1
SFX 3278 y psiler y
SFX 3572 Y 1
SFX 3572 p wergin p
SFX 2601 Y 1
SFX 2601 a uqigha a
SFX 1590 Y 1
SFX 1590 a ush a
SFX 3852 Y 1
SFX 3852 l mlap l
SFX 4826 Y 1
SFX 4826 k likini k
SFX 3995 Y 1
SFX 3995 i uqigha i
SFX 119 Y 1
SFX 119 i ush i
SFX 391 Y 1
SFX 391 r shturulush r
SFX 2859 Y 1
SFX 2859 p ngshen p
SFX 4227 Y 1
SFX 4227 t shturulush t
SFX 3798 Y 1
SFX 3798 a tide a
SFX 3239 Y 1
SFX 3239 p ush p
SFX 2739 Y 1
SFX 2739 k leydighan k
SFX 1243 Y 1
SFX 1243 p watqanliqidin p
SFX 1847 Y 1
SFX 1847 q lghanliqi q
SFX 3403 Y 1
SFX 3403 i ulda i
SFX 1261 Y 1
SFX 1261 r leydighan r
SFX 1536 Y 1
SFX 1536 a durush a
SFX 1403 Y 1
SFX 1403 a ba a
SFX 4366 Y 1
SFX 4366 a imisang a
SFX 1700 Y 1
SFX 1700 k ndin k
SFX 1064 Y 1
SFX 1064 l ndin l
SFX 466 Y 1
SFX 466 m ndin m
SFX 3087 Y 1
SFX 3087 i chige i
SFX 534 Y 1
SFX 534 a idighan a
SFX 1910 Y 1
SFX 1910 a ine a
SFX 658 Y 1
SFX 658 q ndin q
SFX 2766 Y 1
SFX 2766 d idighan d
SFX 2862 Y 1
SFX 2862 r ndin r
SFX 4815 Y 1
SFX 4815 k liwatqan k
SFX 4276 Y 1
SFX 4276 t ndin t
SFX 3595 Y 1
SFX 3595 r shush r
SFX 2965 Y 1
SFX 2965 a turdi a
SFX 5000 Y 1
SFX 5000 t shush t
SFX 3064 Y 1
SFX 3064 l idighan l
SFX 4088 Y 1
SFX 4088 q liwatqan q
SFX 2464 Y 1
SFX 2464 m idighan m
SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 p walghan p
SFX 769 Y 1
SFX 769 p wetkendin p
SFX 2373 Y 1
SFX 2373 o idighan o
SFX 2333 Y 1
SFX 2333 d ran d
SFX 4018 Y 1
SFX 4018 a shi a
SFX 2313 Y 1
SFX 2313 p watqanlarmu p
SFX 1907 Y 1
SFX 1907 a inining a
SFX 3063 Y 1
SFX 3063 t idighan t
SFX 676 Y 1
SFX 676 i rshke i
SFX 441 Y 1
SFX 441 d shi d
SFX 2731 Y 1
SFX 2731 r lmiduq r
SFX 1622 Y 1
SFX 1622 a ikisi a
SFX 2539 Y 1
SFX 2539 a lashturmaq a
SFX 3809 Y 1
SFX 3809 i shi i
SFX 3371 Y 1
SFX 3371 m enliktin m
SFX 4357 Y 1
SFX 4357 a iqla a
SFX 2624 Y 1
SFX 2624 r ngenidi r
SFX 4267 Y 1
SFX 4267 p ngjn p
SFX 757 Y 1
SFX 757 a ighiche a
SFX 586 Y 1
SFX 586 r shi r
SFX 4729 Y 1
SFX 4729 r sta r
SFX 1190 Y 1
SFX 1190 t rde t
SFX 805 Y 1
SFX 805 t shi t
SFX 1185 Y 1
SFX 1185 a et a
SFX 4017 Y 1
SFX 4017 x shi x
SFX 4192 Y 1
SFX 4192 i chidek i
SFX 1188 Y 1
SFX 1188 z shi z
SFX 3098 Y 1
SFX 3098 p wetkende p
SFX 3923 Y 1
SFX 3923 l ighiche l
SFX 3127 Y 1
SFX 3127 m nu m
SFX 310 Y 1
SFX 310 i et i
SFX 4253 Y 1
SFX 4253 m nsimu m
SFX 2930 Y 1
SFX 2930 k et k
SFX 4339 Y 1
SFX 4339 a iwaptu a
SFX 3366 Y 1
SFX 3366 n et n
SFX 2457 Y 1
SFX 2457 a imikin a
SFX 4717 Y 1
SFX 4717 i unglarmu i
SFX 2989 Y 1
SFX 2989 r nsimu r
SFX 2686 Y 1
SFX 2686 t zm t
SFX 4244 Y 1
SFX 4244 s ql s
SFX 3749 Y 1
SFX 3749 t et t
SFX 882 Y 1
SFX 882 u et u
SFX 2368 Y 1
SFX 2368 a iklerning a
SFX 4375 Y 1
SFX 4375 a ilda a
SFX 3913 Y 1
SFX 3913 a inglarni a
SFX 4526 Y 1
SFX 4526 l nla l
SFX 962 Y 1
SFX 962 m nla m
SFX 4445 Y 1
SFX 4445 k ydighandek k
SFX 3118 Y 1
SFX 3118 i rlse i
SFX 1276 Y 1
SFX 1276 e hide e
SFX 4778 Y 1
SFX 4778 q nla q
SFX 3094 Y 1
SFX 3094 n ydighandek n
SFX 4128 Y 1
SFX 4128 a ishta a
SFX 2012 Y 1
SFX 2012 q ydighandek q
SFX 3022 Y 1
SFX 3022 q lsimu q
SFX 4406 Y 1
SFX 4406 d ghandila d
SFX 3980 Y 1
SFX 3980 n yduki n
SFX 1805 Y 1
SFX 1805 a ishing a
SFX 1402 Y 1
SFX 1402 i ende i
SFX 2125 Y 1
SFX 2125 e htiki e
SFX 1340 Y 1
SFX 1340 m ende m
SFX 2937 Y 1
SFX 2937 n ende n
SFX 3355 Y 1
SFX 3355 e hiche e
SFX 4678 Y 1
SFX 4678 u ende u
SFX 1571 Y 1
SFX 1571 a iliship a
SFX 3786 Y 1
SFX 3786 p watsimu p
SFX 4891 Y 1
SFX 4891 a iliqning a
SFX 2205 Y 1
SFX 2205 a ingning a
SFX 1642 Y 1
SFX 1642 i urulidighan i
SFX 4208 Y 1
SFX 4208 p walghudek p
SFX 580 Y 1
SFX 580 a is a
SFX 4990 Y 1
SFX 4990 a uk a
SFX 4297 Y 1
SFX 4297 q lmighanliqini q
SFX 3424 Y 1
SFX 3424 i rduq i
SFX 1942 Y 1
SFX 1942 i uk i
SFX 3710 Y 1
SFX 3710 l is l
SFX 416 Y 1
SFX 416 a imen a
SFX 893 Y 1
SFX 893 o is o
SFX 4376 Y 1
SFX 4376 a ilardek a
SFX 691 Y 1
SFX 691 s is s
SFX 3719 Y 1
SFX 3719 l imen l
SFX 3179 Y 1
SFX 3179 m imen m
SFX 3509 Y 1
SFX 3509 o imen o
SFX 1541 Y 1
SFX 1541 r shturidu r
SFX 565 Y 1
SFX 565 p wet p
SFX 4452 Y 1
SFX 4452 p wettingiz p
SFX 210 Y 1
SFX 210 i gge i
SFX 4573 Y 1
SFX 4573 q lmaptu q
SFX 3919 Y 1
SFX 3919 t imen t
SFX 3822 Y 1
SFX 3822 a qanliqi a
SFX 4710 Y 1
SFX 4710 i ushmu i
SFX 1500 Y 1
SFX 1500 i urdum i
SFX 166 Y 1
SFX 166 i urul i
SFX 3218 Y 1
SFX 3218 t diler t
SFX 1627 Y 1
SFX 1627 i giche i
SFX 1277 Y 1
SFX 1277 m giche m
SFX 2168 Y 1
SFX 2168 a ologiye a
SFX 3070 Y 1
SFX 3070 p giche p
SFX 389 Y 1
SFX 389 a inidighan a
SFX 4627 Y 1
SFX 4627 a imasliqqa a
SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52 a ida a
SFX 4160 Y 1
SFX 4160 d ida d
SFX 1413 Y 1
SFX 1413 s qchimu s
SFX 3902 Y 1
SFX 3902 a iwtiptu a
SFX 1215 Y 1
SFX 1215 d rt d
SFX 2799 Y 1
SFX 2799 r zlirini r
SFX 522 Y 1
SFX 522 l ida l
SFX 2292 Y 1
SFX 2292 n ida n
SFX 898 Y 1
SFX 898 i ursa i
SFX 809 Y 1
SFX 809 o ida o
SFX 792 Y 1
SFX 792 a lirining a
SFX 1454 Y 1
SFX 1454 m nlardin m
SFX 807 Y 1
SFX 807 d lirining d
SFX 4943 Y 1
SFX 4943 i chilap i
SFX 4259 Y 1
SFX 4259 q nlardin q
SFX 2706 Y 1
SFX 2706 t rt t
SFX 983 Y 1
SFX 983 k lirining k
SFX 2344 Y 1
SFX 2344 l mlarni l
SFX 765 Y 1
SFX 765 a iqlar a
SFX 566 Y 1
SFX 566 i ungni i
SFX 3417 Y 1
SFX 3417 d shida d
SFX 1973 Y 1
SFX 1973 q lirining q
SFX 2529 Y 1
SFX 2529 r lirining r
SFX 617 Y 1
SFX 617 s lirining s
SFX 2183 Y 1
SFX 2183 t lirining t
SFX 1936 Y 1
SFX 1936 p wring p
SFX 3003 Y 1
SFX 3003 l mr l
SFX 3806 Y 1
SFX 3806 d shtiki d
SFX 3648 Y 1
SFX 3648 m naq m
SFX 2617 Y 1
SFX 2617 i pi i
SFX 4135 Y 1
SFX 4135 q iqlar q
SFX 3568 Y 1
SFX 3568 n yimu n
SFX 3850 Y 1
SFX 3850 k msiler k
SFX 1344 Y 1
SFX 1344 r zining r
SFX 122 Y 1
SFX 122 a isimu a
SFX 2544 Y 1
SFX 2544 q klik q
SFX 2509 Y 1
SFX 2509 n pi n
SFX 1977 Y 1
SFX 1977 r klik r
SFX 1968 Y 1
SFX 1968 q msiler q
SFX 2342 Y 1
SFX 2342 r msiler r
SFX 1432 Y 1
SFX 1432 r gh r
SFX 530 Y 1
SFX 530 r shtiki r
SFX 708 Y 1
SFX 708 s gh s
SFX 1447 Y 1
SFX 1447 t shtiki t
SFX 1883 Y 1
SFX 1883 y pi y
SFX 3706 Y 1
SFX 3706 o isimu o
SFX 4668 Y 1
SFX 4668 z gh z
SFX 4705 Y 1
SFX 4705 p wteleydu p
SFX 2959 Y 1
SFX 2959 i urghuchilar i
SFX 3512 Y 1
SFX 3512 a iliqtin a
SFX 1212 Y 1
SFX 1212 i urimiz i
SFX 901 Y 1
SFX 901 r qni r
SFX 900 Y 1
SFX 900 s qni s
SFX 3271 Y 1
SFX 3271 t qni t
SFX 3426 Y 1
SFX 3426 r qluq r
SFX 1159 Y 1
SFX 1159 k ysen k
SFX 4514 Y 1
SFX 4514 z qni z
SFX 250 Y 1
SFX 250 n ysen n
SFX 4011 Y 1
SFX 4011 r shtrshke r
SFX 3382 Y 1
SFX 3382 r zar r
SFX 2983 Y 1
SFX 2983 r qlashmaq r
SFX 709 Y 1
SFX 709 q ysen q
SFX 4759 Y 1
SFX 4759 s qlashmaq s
SFX 4691 Y 1
SFX 4691 r ysen r
SFX 1683 Y 1
SFX 1683 s ysen s
SFX 2592 Y 1
SFX 2592 r zdi r
SFX 3834 Y 1
SFX 3834 m ningiz m
SFX 4349 Y 1
SFX 4349 a ishiwatatti a
SFX 797 Y 1
SFX 797 a imaydighan a
SFX 496 Y 1
SFX 496 m ngizdin m
SFX 800 Y 1
SFX 800 i glardin i
SFX 279 Y 1
SFX 279 a ighu a
SFX 3842 Y 1
SFX 3842 p ngizdin p
SFX 2919 Y 1
SFX 2919 e hp e
SFX 4268 Y 1
SFX 4268 y ngizdin y
SFX 879 Y 1
SFX 879 a ikining a
SFX 975 Y 1
SFX 975 i urushta i
SFX 4565 Y 1
SFX 4565 k lmighan k
SFX 1306 Y 1
SFX 1306 a itiwetti a
SFX 1851 Y 1
SFX 1851 a irimizdin a
SFX 1508 Y 1
SFX 1508 i rshning i
SFX 4301 Y 1
SFX 4301 k lliridin k
SFX 607 Y 1
SFX 607 q lmighan q
SFX 1049 Y 1
SFX 1049 r lmighan r
SFX 3855 Y 1
SFX 3855 l mimu l
SFX 2071 Y 1
SFX 2071 i upla i
SFX 4229 Y 1
SFX 4229 r shsimu r
SFX 3204 Y 1
SFX 3204 a ey a
SFX 621 Y 1
SFX 621 i ey i
SFX 1231 Y 1
SFX 1231 a iliqqa a
SFX 3747 Y 1
SFX 3747 m ey m
SFX 1092 Y 1
SFX 1092 k msen k
SFX 4792 Y 1
SFX 4792 l mtir l
SFX 2104 Y 1
SFX 2104 l mal l
SFX 2429 Y 1
SFX 2429 l msen l
SFX 1433 Y 1
SFX 1433 n ey n
SFX 775 Y 1
SFX 775 p ey p
SFX 3946 Y 1
SFX 3946 r ey r
SFX 721 Y 1
SFX 721 q msen q
SFX 965 Y 1
SFX 965 r msen r
SFX 1476 Y 1
SFX 1476 a iqimizni a
SFX 472 Y 1
SFX 472 u ey u
SFX 3498 Y 1
SFX 3498 a isighiche a
SFX 2929 Y 1
SFX 2929 y ey y
SFX 1230 Y 1
SFX 1230 a ilirimu a
SFX 2434 Y 1
SFX 2434 k llirini k
SFX 1578 Y 1
SFX 1578 i emni i
SFX 101 Y 1
SFX 101 p wetti p
SFX 3235 Y 1
SFX 3235 p walsimu p
SFX 2693 Y 1
SFX 2693 a uzup a
SFX 1689 Y 1
SFX 1689 i ungdin i
SFX 4468 Y 1
SFX 4468 i urluq i
SFX 3276 Y 1
SFX 3276 y ptuq y
SFX 3245 Y 1
SFX 3245 i uqliri i
SFX 2078 Y 1
SFX 2078 d shqa d
SFX 1993 Y 1
SFX 1993 a ilashturush a
SFX 3436 Y 1
SFX 3436 m nshi m
SFX 143 Y 1
SFX 143 r shqa r
SFX 267 Y 1
SFX 267 t shqa t
SFX 4252 Y 1
SFX 4252 m nush m
SFX 3721 Y 1
SFX 3721 a ilirim a
SFX 2120 Y 1
SFX 2120 a ipla a
SFX 4890 Y 1
SFX 4890 a imaptu a
SFX 2501 Y 1
SFX 2501 z shqa z
SFX 3143 Y 1
SFX 3143 l mlarning l
SFX 2304 Y 1
SFX 2304 i ensiz i
SFX 113 Y 1
SFX 113 p wlip p
SFX 2319 Y 1
SFX 2319 a up a
SFX 2431 Y 1
SFX 2431 a mek a
SFX 2430 Y 1
SFX 2430 d mek d
SFX 248 Y 1
SFX 248 i up i
SFX 130 Y 1
SFX 130 k mek k
SFX 1067 Y 1
SFX 1067 l mek l
SFX 2206 Y 1
SFX 2206 a ingizda a
SFX 2269 Y 1
SFX 2269 k lo k
SFX 2696 Y 1
SFX 2696 p up p
SFX 3101 Y 1
SFX 3101 p walghanidim p
SFX 4804 Y 1
SFX 4804 p mek p
SFX 630 Y 1
SFX 630 a imaqchi a
SFX 3147 Y 1
SFX 3147 r mek r
SFX 4617 Y 1
SFX 4617 a iringizgha a
SFX 4207 Y 1
SFX 4207 p watqanliqining p
SFX 945 Y 1
SFX 945 t mek t
SFX 185 Y 1
SFX 185 r shqan r
SFX 2970 Y 1
SFX 2970 r shsun r
SFX 1598 Y 1
SFX 1598 t shqan t
SFX 17 Y 1
SFX 17 a iri a
SFX 4497 Y 1
SFX 4497 a se a
SFX 1189 Y 1
SFX 1189 d se d
SFX 4593 Y 1
SFX 4593 k likke k
SFX 1134 Y 1
SFX 1134 a qan a
SFX 535 Y 1
SFX 535 p waldim p
SFX 923 Y 1
SFX 923 a sun a
SFX 1325 Y 1
SFX 1325 a mighan a
SFX 2282 Y 1
SFX 2282 o iri o
SFX 710 Y 1
SFX 710 d sun d
SFX 2553 Y 1
SFX 2553 q iri q
SFX 3856 Y 1
SFX 3856 d mighan d
SFX 844 Y 1
SFX 844 r iri r
SFX 3385 Y 1
SFX 3385 n yish n
SFX 1705 Y 1
SFX 1705 a maqta a
